Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-136
Release of original birth certificate; when.

If a consent form has been signed and filed by both biological parents or by the biological mother of a child born out of wedlock, and no nonconsent form, as provided in section 43-143, has been filed, a copy of the adopted person's original birth certificate shall be provided to the adopted person.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 18.